Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5202.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2837. (1) A health care professional must file a written report with the department regarding each patient who comes under the health care professional's professional care suffering from a physical complication or death that is the primary, secondary, or tertiary result of an abortion. (2) The department shall summarize aggregate data from the reports required under subsection (1) for the purposes of inclusion into the annual statistical report on abortion required under section 2835. (3) The department shall destroy each individual report required by this section and each copy of the report after retaining the report for 5 years after the date the report is received. (4) The department shall develop a standardized form for the report required under subsection (1). The department shall not include on the standardized form the name or address of the patient who is the subject of the report or any other information that could reasonably be expected to identify the patient who is the subject of the report. The department must include on the standardized form instructions on how to fill out and return the form and a statement specifying the time period within which a report must be transmitted under section 2835. The department shall distribute the standardized form to each urgent care facility and emergency department in this state and shall make the standardized form available to the public on the department's website. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S04533'25) or House Bill No. 5201 (request no. H04533'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.